nl: Kantoorartikelen > Kantoorbenodigdheden > Schrijfinstrumenten > Markeerstiften: Highlighters; Markers
zh-TW: 辦公室用品 > 事務用品 > 書寫/繪畫用具 > 麥克筆/螢光筆: 螢光筆; 麥克筆
el: Προμήθειες γραφείου > Όργανα γραφείου > Όργανα γραφής & σχεδίασης > Μαρκαδόροι & υπογραμμιστές: Υπογραμμιστές; Μαρκαδόροι
da: Kontorforsyning > Kontorredskaber > Skrive- og tegneredskaber > Fremhævningspenne og highlightere: Overstregningstuscher; Fremhævningspenne
cs: Kancelářské potřeby > Kancelářské nástroje > Psací potřeby > Popisovače a zvýrazňovače: Zvýrazňovače; Popisovače
zh-CN: 办公用品 > 办公文具 > 书写/绘图工具 > 记号笔/荧光笔: 荧光笔; 马克笔
ko: 사무용품 > 사무기구 > 필기구/제도용구 > 마커/형광펜: 하이라이터; 마커
pl: Artykuły biurowe > Akcesoria biurowe > Przybory piśmiennicze i rysunkowe > Markery i zakreślacze: Zakreślacze; Markery
sv: Kontorsmaterial > Kontorsinstrument > Skriv- och ritinstrument > Märkpennor och överstrykningspennor: Överstrykningspennor; Märkpennor
sl-SI: Pisarniški material > Pisarniški pripomočki > Pisalna in risalna orodja > Flomastri in označevalci besedila: Označevalci besedila; Flomastri
it: Forniture per ufficio > Strumenti per ufficio > Strumenti per scrivere e disegnare > Pennarelli ed evidenziatori: Evidenziatori; Pennarelli
es: Material de oficina > Artículos de oficina > Artículos de escritura y dibujo > Rotuladores y marcadores: Resaltadores; Marcadores
de: Bürobedarf > Büroarbeitsmittel > Schreibgeräte > Markierstifte & Textmarker: Textmarker; Markierungen
th: อุปกรณ์สำนักงาน > เครื่องมือสำนักงาน > อุปกรณ์วาดเขียน > ปากกามาร์กเกอร์และปากกาไฮไลต์: ปากกาเน้นข้อความ; ปากกามาร์กเกอร์
ru: Товары для офиса и канцтовары > Офисные принадлежности > Письменные принадлежности > Маркеры и текстовыделители: Текстовыделители; Маркеры
ja: オフィス用品 > 事務用品 > 筆記用具 > マーカーペン・蛍光ペン: 蛍光ペン; マーカー
vi: Văn phòng phẩm > Dụng cụ văn phòng > Dụng cụ vẽ và viết > Giấy và bút đánh dấu: Bút nhớ dòng; Bút dạ
pt-PT: Materiais de escritório > Material de escritório > Instrumentos de escrita e desenho > Marcadores e sublinhadores: Sublinhadores; Marcadores
fr: Fournitures de bureau > Accessoires de bureau > Instruments d’écriture et de dessin > Marqueurs et surligneurs: Surligneurs; Marqueurs
hr-HR: Uredski materijal > Uredski uređaji > Pribor za pisanje i crtanje > Markeri i markeri za podcrtavanje: Markeri za podcrtavanje; Markeri
hu: Irodai kellékek > Irodai eszközök > Író- és rajzeszközök > Filctollak és kiemelők: Kiemelők; Filctollak
nb: Kontormateriell > Kontorinstrumenter > Skrive- og tegneinstrumenter > Markørpenner og highlightere: Highlightere; Markørpenner
ro-RO: Consumabile de birou > Instrumente de birou > Instrumente de scris și desen > Markere și evidențiatoare: Evidențiatoare; Markere
sk-SK: Kancelárske potreby > Kancelárske nástroje > Písacie a kresliace potreby > Popisovače a zvýrazňovače: Zvýrazňovače; Popisovače
fi: Toimistotarvikkeet > Toimistovälineet > Kirjoitus- ja piirustusvälineet > Tussit ja korostuskynät: Korostuskynät; Tussit
bg-BG: Офис консумативи > Офис инструменти > Инструменти за писане и рисуване > Маркери и текст маркери: Текст маркери; Маркери
lt-LT: Biuro reikmenys > Biuro instrumentai > Rašymo ir piešimo priemonės > Žymekliai ir paryškinimo rašikliai: Paryškinimo rašikliai; Žymekliai
en: Office Supplies > Office Instruments > Writing & Drawing Instruments > Markers & Highlighters: Highlighters; Markers
pt-BR: Materiais de escritório > Instrumentos de escritório > Instrumentos de escrita > Marcadores e marca-textos: Marca-textos; Marcadores
tr: Büro Malzemeleri > Ofis Aletleri > Yazım ve Çizim Aletleri > Markörler ve Vurgulayıcılar: Fosforlu Kalemler; Keçeli Kalemler